Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2197.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 29, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-2931, to read: START_STATUTE13-2931. Unlawful camping; classification A. It is unlawful for a person to camp within three hundred yards of a natural water hole containing water or a man-made watering facility containing water in such a place that domestic stock could be denied access. B. A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 17-308, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE17-308. Unlawful camping It is unlawful for a person to camp within one-fourth mile three hundred yards of a natural water hole containing water or a man-made watering facility containing water in such a place that wildlife or domestic stock will could be denied access to the only reasonably available water. END_STATUTE